Maryland, session 2026, HB0781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–213.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY
MURDER” MEANS THE LEGAL PENALTIES THAT TAKE AWAY AN INDIVIDUAL’S
FREEDOM, RIGHTS, AND ACCESS TO PROGRAMS OR SERVICES AFTER CONVICTION
FOR MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 2–201(A)(4) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AGE–APPROPRIATE
CURRICULUM RESOURCES FOR INSTRUCTION ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0781*

HOUSE BILL 781
CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER FOR STUDENTS IN GRADES 6 THROUGH 8 IN
PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE STATE.
(2) THE STATE BOARD SHALL DETERMINE THE APPROPRIATE
SUBJECT AREA FOR STUDENTS IN GRADES 6 THROUGH 8 TO INCORPORATE THE
INSTRUCTION ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER.
(C) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY
BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AND INCORPORATE INSTRUCTION BASED ON THE
CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER CURRICULUM RESOURCES
DEVELOPED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ENSURE THAT EACH STUDENT IS
INSTRUCTED ON THE CONSEQUENCES OF A CONVICTION FOR FELONY MURDER AT
LEAST ONCE DURING GRADES 6 THROUGH 8.
(D) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.